Illinois, session 104th, HB4081.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. If and only if House Bill 742 of the 104th 5General Assembly becomes law in the form in which it passed the 6Senate on April 10, 2025, then the Digital Assets and Consumer 7Protection Act is amended by changing Section 20-30 as 8follows: 9    (10400HB0742eng., Sec. 20-30)10    Sec. 20-30. Change in control. 11    (a) As used in this Section, "proposed person to be in 12control" means the person that would control a registrant 13after a proposed transaction that would result in a change in 14control of the registrant. 15    (b) The following rules apply in determining whether a 16person has control over a registrant: 17        (1) There is a rebuttable presumption of control if a 18    person directly or indirectly owns, controls, holds with 19    the power to vote, or holds proxies representing 10% or 20    more of the then outstanding voting securities issued by 21    the registrant.22        (2) A person has control over a registrant if the 23    person's voting power in the registrant constitutes or   HB4081- 2 -LRB104 13876 BAB 26720 b1    will constitute at least 25% of the total voting power of 2    the registrant. 3        (3) There is a rebuttable presumption of control if 4    the person's voting power in another person constitutes or 5    will constitute at least 10% of the total voting power of 6    the other person and the other person's voting power in 7    the registrant constitutes at least 10% of the total 8    voting power of the registrant. 9        (4) There is no presumption of control solely because 10    an individual is an executive officer of the registrant. 11    The Department shall afford any person seeking to rebut a 12presumption in this subsection an opportunity to submit a 13rebuttal in writing. The Department shall have 10 business 14days to review the written submission after receiving it. If 15the Department determines that the presumption has not been 16rebutted, it shall, within the review period of 10 business 17days, either notify the submitter in writing of its 18determination and the reasons for its determination or request 19additional information from the submitter that is material to 20the question of whether the submitter has control over a 21registrant. If the Department does not provide a written 22determination or request for additional material information 23within 10 business days after receiving the written 24submission, the presumption shall be deemed rebutted. Any 25amendment or supplementation by the submitter will be treated 26as the filing of a new written submission under this   HB4081- 3 -LRB104 13876 BAB 26720 b1paragraph, and the Department shall have 10 business days from 2the receipt of an amendment or supplementation to review the 3submission. 4    (c) Before a proposed change in control of a registrant, 5the proposed person to be in control shall submit to the 6Department in a record all of the following: 7        (1) An application in a form and medium prescribed by 8    the Department. 9        (2) The information and records that Section 15-10 10    would require if the proposed person to be in control 11    already had control of the registrant. 12    (d) The Department shall not approve an application unless 13the Secretary finds all of the following:14        (1) The proposed person to be in control and all 15    executive officers of the proposed person to be in 16    control, if any, are of good character and sound financial 17    standing. 18        (2) The proposed person to be in control is competent 19    to engage in digital asset business activity. 20        (3) It is reasonable to believe that, if the person 21    acquires control of the registrant, the proposed person to 22    be in control and the registrant will comply with all 23    applicable provisions of this Act and any rules or order 24    issued under this Act.25        (4) Any plans by the proposed person to be in control 26    to change the business, corporate structure, or management   HB4081- 4 -LRB104 13876 BAB 26720 b1    of the registrant are not detrimental to the safety and 2    soundness of the registrant.3    (e) The Department, in accordance with Section 15-10, 4shall approve, approve with conditions, or deny an application 5for a change in control of a registrant. The Department, in a 6record, shall send notice of its decision to the registrant 7and the person that would be in control if the Department had 8approved the change in control. If the Department denies the 9application, the registrant shall abandon the proposed change 10in control or cease digital asset business activity with or on 11behalf of residents. 12    (f) If the Department applies a condition to approval of a 13change in control of a registrant, and the Department does not 14receive notice of the applicant's acceptance of the condition 15specified by the Department not later than 31 days after the 16Department sends notice of the condition, the application is 17deemed denied. If the application is deemed denied, the 18registrant shall abandon the proposed change in control or 19cease digital asset business activity with or on behalf of 20residents. 21    (g) The Department may revoke or modify a determination 22under subsection (d), after notice and opportunity to be 23heard, if, in its judgment, revocation or modification is 24consistent with this Act. 25    (h) If a change in control of a registrant requires 26approval of another regulatory agency, and the action of the   HB4081- 5 -LRB104 13876 BAB 26720 b1other agency conflicts with that of the Department, the 2Department shall confer with the other agency. If the proposed 3change in control cannot be completed because the conflict 4cannot be resolved, the registrant shall abandon the change in 5control or cease digital asset business activity with or on 6behalf of residents. 7(Source: 10400HB0742eng.)